Tennessee, session 114, HB0997.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-106(e), is amended by
deleting the language "§ 49-13-113(b)" and substituting instead the language "§ 49-13-113" and
by adding the following as a new subdivision:
(3) Subdivision (e)(1) does not allow a public charter school authorized in its
charter agreement to locate in a county LEA to charge a student who resides in the
county any registration fees, enrollment fees, or tuition if the student transfers to the
public charter school from another LEA located in the same county.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-113(c)(3), is amended by
adding the following language at the end of the subdivision:
This subdivision (c)(3) does not allow a public charter school authorized in its
charter agreement to locate in a county LEA to charge a student who resides in
the county any registration fees, enrollment fees, or tuition if the student transfers
to the public charter school from another LEA located in the same county.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0997
001818
- 1 -